Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.690

Graduation rate improvement—Findings.

The legislature finds that, in public colleges and universities, improvement is needed in graduation rates and in the length of time required for students to attain their educational objectives. The legislature also finds that public colleges and universities should offer classes in a way that will permit full-time students to complete a degree or certificate program in about the amount of time described in the institution's catalog as necessary to complete that degree or certificate program.

[ 1993 c 414 s 1.]